Utah statutes.
63H-2-504.   Relation to other state statutes.

(1)  The authority is subject to review by the Retirement and Independent Entities Committee in accordance with Title 63E, Chapter 1, Independent Entities Act.

(2)  The authority is subject to:

(a)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(b)  Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(c)  Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act;

(d)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code;

(e)  Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;

(f)  Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;

(g)  Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;

(h)  Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code;

(i)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act;

(j)  Title 63J, Chapter 2, Revenue Procedures and Control Act; and

(k)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

